Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-1507
Ownership by more than one person; how alleged.

When any offense is committed upon or in relation to any property belonging to several partners, limited liability company members, or owners, and an indictment for such offense is returned, the allegation of ownership therein shall be sufficient if it alleges that such property belonged to any one or more of such partners, limited liability company members, or owners, without naming all of them.

G.S.1873, c. 58, § 418, p. 818;

R.S.1913, § 9056;

C.S.1922, § 10080;

C.S.1929, § 29-1507;

R.S.1943, § 29-1507;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 191;

Laws 1994, LB 884, § 55.

Allegation of ownership is not an essential element in charging the crime of burglary. Sedlacek v. State, 147 Neb. 834, 25 N.W.2d 533 (1946).

When property of several partners is stolen, information is sufficient if it alleges property belongs to any one or more of such partners. Brown v. State, 103 Neb. 271, 171 N.W. 906 (1919).

In charging offense upon property of several owners, it is sufficient to allege ownership in one or more. Brinegar v. State, 82 Neb. 558, 118 N.W. 475 (1908).